Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-440
Disposition of records after review by the convening authority.

When the convening authority has taken final action in a court-martial case, he shall send the entire record, including his action thereon and the opinion or opinions of the Staff Judge Advocate or legal officer, to the State Judge Advocate.

Laws 1969, c. 458, § 40, p. 1571.